Vermont, session 2025-2026, H595.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 3512 is amended to read:
§ 3512. CHILD CARE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
ELIGIBILITY
(a)(1) The Child Care Financial Assistance Program is established to
subsidize the costs of child care for families that need child care services in
order to obtain employment, to retain employment, or to obtain training
leading to employment. Families seeking employment shall be entitled to
VT LEG #386185 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.595
2026 Page 2 of 2
participate in the Program for up to three months and the Commissioner may
further extend that period.
* * *
(7) A family residing outside Vermont may participate in the Program
when the child is enrolled in a participating child care program and the child’s
parent or guardian is employed in Vermont.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386185 v.1